Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 39. Rates and Rating Organizations.
Sec. 21.39.100.
Advisory organizations.

Each group, association or other organization of insurers, whether located inside or outside this state, that assists insurers that make their own filings or rating organizations in rate making by the collection and furnishing of loss or expense statistics or by the submission of recommendations, but that does not make filings under this chapter, shall be known as an advisory organization.

Each advisory organization shall file with the director

a copy of its constitution, its articles of agreement or association, or its certificate of incorporation and of its bylaws and regulations governing its activities;

a list of its members;

the name and address of a resident of this state upon whom notices or orders of the director or process issued at the direction of the director may be served; and

an agreement that the director may examine the advisory organization in accordance with AS

21.39.120

.

If, after a hearing, the director finds that the furnishing of the information or assistance involves an act or practice that is unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, the director may issue a written order specifying in what respects the act or practice is unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, and requiring the discontinuance of the act or practice.

An insurer that makes its own filings and a rating organization may not support its filings by statistics or adopt rate making recommendations, furnished to it by an advisory organization that has not complied with this section or with an order of the director involving the statistics or recommendations issued under (c) of this section. If the director finds the insurer or rating organization to be in violation of this subsection the director may issue an order requiring the discontinuance of the violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

For workers’ compensation review and advisory committee, see 3 AAC 30, art. 3.

Sec. 21.39.110.
Joint underwriting or joint reinsurance.

Each group, association, or other organization of insurers that engages in joint underwriting or joint reinsurance is subject to regulation in accordance with this section. In addition, joint underwriting is subject to all other provisions of this chapter, except for AS

21.39.210

, and joint reinsurance is subject to AS

21.39.120

,

21.39.160

, and

21.39.170

.

If, after a hearing, the director finds that an activity or practice of a group, association, or other organization is unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, the director may issue a written order specifying in what respects the activity or practice is unfair or unreasonable or otherwise inconsistent with this chapter, and requiring the discontinuance of the activity or practice.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Sec. 21.39.120.
Examinations.

The director shall, at least once in five years, make or cause to be made an examination of each rating organization licensed in this state under AS

21.39.060

and may, as often as the director may consider it expedient, make or cause to be made an examination of each advisory organization referred to in AS

21.39.100

and of each group, association, or other organization referred to in AS

21.39.110

. The reasonable costs of the examination shall be paid by the rating organization, advisory organization, or group, association, or other organization examined upon presentation to it of a detailed account of the costs. The officers, manager, agents, and employees of the rating organization, advisory organization, or group, association, or other organization may be examined at any time under oath and shall exhibit all books, records, accounts, documents, or agreements governing its method of operation. In lieu of an examination the director may accept the report of an examination made by the insurance supervisory official of another state, under the laws of that state.

A report of an examination may not be made public unless the rating organization, advisory organization, group, association, or other organization examined within 30 days after its receipt of the director’s written notice of intention to publicize the report, does not apply to the director for a hearing. If the application is made within the 30 days, the director shall hold a hearing, after first giving reasonable written notice of the time and place, and either approve or disapprove the report as being correct. If the director approves the report or if no application is made for a hearing, the report shall immediately become and be admissible in evidence as a public record, and open to public inspection.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.39.130.
Rate administration.

The director shall adopt reasonable regulations and statistical plans, reasonably adapted to each of the rating systems filed with the director, that may be modified and that shall be used by each insurer in the recording and reporting of its loss and countrywide expense experience, in order that the experience of all insurers may be made available at least annually in the form and detail that may be necessary to aid in determining whether rating systems comply with the standards set out in AS

21.39.030

. The regulations and plans may also provide for the recording and reporting of expense experience items that are specially applicable to this state and are not susceptible of determination by a prorating of countrywide expense experience. In adopting the regulations and plans, the director shall give due consideration to the rating systems filed with the director and, in order that the regulations and plans may be as uniform as is practicable among the several states, to the regulations and to the form of the plans used for the rating systems in other states. An insurer may not be required to record or report its loss experience on a classification basis that is inconsistent with the rating system filed by it. The director may designate one or more rating organizations or other agencies to assist in gathering the experience and making compilations. The compilations shall be made available, subject to reasonable regulations adopted by the director, to insurers and rating organizations.

Reasonable regulations and plans may be adopted by the director for the interchange of data necessary for the application of rating plans.

In order to further uniform administration of rate regulatory laws, the director and each insurer and rating organization may exchange information and experience data with insurance supervisory officials, insurers, and rating organizations in other states and may consult with them with respect to rate making and the application of rating systems.

The director may adopt reasonable regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Administrative Code. —

For rate and rating plan filings, see 3 AAC 29, art. 2.

For group-marketed property and casualty insurance, see 3 AAC 29, art. 3.

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

For premium installment payments, see 3 AAC 30, art. 2.

For workers’ compensation review and advisory committee, see 3 AAC 30, art. 3.

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.39.140.
False or misleading information.

A person or organization may not wilfully withhold information from, or knowingly give false or misleading information to, the director, a statistical agency designated by the director, a rating organization, or an insurer, that will affect the rates or premiums chargeable under this chapter.
A violation of this section shall subject the one guilty of the violation to the penalties provided in AS

21.39.160

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.39.150.
Assigned risks.

Agreements may be made among insurers with respect to the equitable apportionment among them of insurance that may be afforded applicants who are in good faith entitled to the insurance but who are unable to procure the insurance through ordinary methods.
The insurers may agree among themselves on the use of reasonable rate modifications for the insurance. The agreements and rate modifications are subject to the approval of the director.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.39.155.
Assigned risk pool.

The director may require insurers, except a reciprocal insurer formed under AS 21.75, as a condition of writing a line of insurance dealing with medical malpractice or workers’ compensation, to participate in an assigned risk pool if the director finds that mandatory carrier participation is in the public interest.

The assigned risk pool and the procedures to be followed in administering the pool shall be established by regulation.

An insurer may impose a surcharge not to exceed 25 percent of the premium for assigned risk pool insurance, except that a surcharge may not be applied to the first $3,000 in premium in any policy year.

History.

(§ 1 ch 252 SLA 1976; am § 1 ch 104 SLA 1983; am § 2 ch 48 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 136 SLA 1986; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 14 SLA 1991; am § 71 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 2 ch 10 FSSLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For assigned risk pool, see 3 AAC 30, art. 1.

For workers’ compensation review and advisory committee, see 3 AAC 30, art. 3.

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 116, ch. 62, SLA 1995, the amendment made to subsection (a) by § 71, ch. 62, SLA 1995 is retroactive to January 1, 1983.

Sec. 21.39.160.
Penalties.

If the director finds, following an appropriate hearing, that a person or organization has violated a provision of this chapter, the director may impose a civil penalty not to exceed $200 or the actual amount of gain, whichever is greater, for each violation, but if the director finds the violation to be wilful the director may impose a penalty of $2,000 or three times the actual amount of gain, whichever is greater, for each violation. The penalties may be in addition to any other penalty provided by law. In this section, “gain” means the difference between the amount actually charged and the amount that should have been charged under applicable filings of the person or organization.

The director may suspend the license of a rating organization or insurer that fails to comply with an order of the director within the time limited by the order or an extension of time granted by the director. The director may not suspend the license of a rating organization or insurer for failure to comply with an order until the time prescribed for an appeal has expired or, if an appeal has been taken, until the order has been affirmed. The director may determine when a suspension of license becomes effective. The suspension shall remain in effect for the period fixed by the director unless the director modifies or rescinds the suspension, or until the order upon which the suspension is based is modified, rescinded, or reversed.

A penalty may not be imposed and a license may not be suspended or revoked except upon a written order of the director, stating findings, made after a hearing held upon not less than 10 days written notice to the person or organization specifying the alleged violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 11 ch 149 SLA 1984)

Sec. 21.39.170.
Hearing procedure and judicial review.

An insurer or rating organization to which the director has issued an order made without a hearing may, within 30 days after notice to it of the order, make written request to the director for a hearing. The director shall hear the party or parties within 20 days after receipt of the request and shall give not less than 10 days written notice of the time and place of the hearing. Within 15 days after the hearing the director shall affirm, reverse or modify the previous action, specifying the reasons. Pending the hearing and decision the director may suspend or postpone the effective date of the previous action.

Nothing contained in this chapter may require the observance at a hearing of formal rules of pleading or evidence.

An order or decision of the director is subject to review by appeal to the superior court at the instance of a party in interest. The court shall determine whether the filing of the appeal will operate as a stay of an order or decision of the director. The court may, in disposing of the issue before it, modify, affirm, or reverse the order or decision of the director in whole or in part.

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966)

Sec. 21.39.175.
Statistics. [Repealed, § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 21.39.180.
[Renumbered as AS 21.39.030(c).]

Sec. 21.39.210.
Flex-rating.

Except for workers’ compensation, medical malpractice, and assigned risk plan rates, an insurer’s rate level increase or decrease may take effect without prior approval if the cumulative rate level change for all coverages combined, calculated from the effective date to 12 months before the effective date, is not greater than 10 percent.

An insurer may make multiple rate filings under this provision during any 12-month period if the cumulative rate level change is within the specified limitation as described in (a) of this section. For an insurer adopting a rating organization prospective loss cost filing, the cumulative rate level change includes both the rating organization’s prospective loss cost change as well as the insurer’s loss cost adjustment change.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, for a policy governed by this section, a filing that produces a rate level change within the limitations provided in (a) of this section is effective without prior approval and may take effect on the date specified in the filing, but not earlier than the date it is received by the division. A rate level change within the limitation in (a) of this section may not be applied to a policy until the beginning of the policy period.

A filing submitted under (a) of this section must include an exhibit showing the calculation of the overall rate level change and an exhibit showing the insurer’s expense provisions. An insurer submitting a loss cost adjustment filing shall include supporting information showing how the loss cost adjustment is calculated. The director may request additional supporting information if the director does not have enough information upon which to determine if the filing meets the requirements of this title.

A filing submitted under (a) of this section is considered to comply with this title. However, if the director determines that the filing does not meet the requirements of this title, the director shall issue an order specifying in detail the specific statutes the insurer has violated and the reasons the filing is not in compliance. The order must state a reasonable future date on which the filing is to be considered no longer effective. An order by the director under this subsection is prospective and does not affect any contract issued or made before the effective date of the order.

The director may adopt regulations implementing the provisions of this section.

This section does not apply to rating organizations or to any impaired or insolvent insurer operating under a rehabilitation plan, an order of supervision, or an impaired financial condition as determined by the director.

History.

(§ 8 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.

Sec. 21.39.220.
File and use, filing of rates, supplementary rate information, and supporting information.

An insurer’s rate level increase or decrease filing falling outside of the limitation provided in AS

21.39.210(a)

is subject to file and use provisions under this section, unless the filing is otherwise exempt from those provisions under another provision in this chapter. A rate filing from a rating organization shall be submitted to the director under the file and use provisions. A rate filing from an insurer operating under a rehabilitation plan, an order of supervision, or an impaired financial condition as determined by the director shall be submitted to the division under the prior approval provisions. The insurer shall submit a filing for a new product or coverage introduction that does not have a rate on file under the file and use provisions.

Each insurer shall file with the director all rates, supplementary rate information, and supporting information at least 30 days before the proposed effective date. The director shall review the filing within 15 days. This period may be extended by the director for an additional period not to exceed 15 days if the director gives written notice within the initial 15-day period to the insurer or rating organization that made the filing that states additional time for the consideration of the filing is required. The waiting period is the 30-day period following the date the director receives the filing.

The filing must include the effective date that may not be before the end of the waiting period. Upon written application by the insurer or rating organization, the director may authorize a filing that the director has reviewed to become effective before the expiration of the waiting period.

A filing shall be considered to meet the requirements of this chapter and to become effective unless disapproved by the director within the waiting period.

The director shall disapprove a filing if the director finds that the filing does not meet the requirements of this title.

If the insurer or rating organization is unable to provide information requested by the director under AS

21.39.040(d)

within 30 days after the director’s request, the response period may be extended by the director for an additional 15 days upon written application of the insurer or rating organization within the initial 30-day response period. The director may disapprove the filing for failure to provide the requested information during the response period. The disapproval notice must state a reasonable future date on which the filing is to be considered no longer effective.

A filing and supporting information shall be open to public inspection after the director completes the review of the filing or after the filing becomes effective, whichever is later.

If within the waiting period in (b) of this section, the director finds that a filing does not meet the requirements of this title, the director shall send to the insurer or rating organization that made the filing, written notice of disapproval of the filing specifying in what respects the filing fails to meet the requirements of this title and shall state a reasonable future date on which the filing is to be considered no longer effective.

History.

(§ 8 ch 88 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For filing procedure for forms, rates, manuals, rating plans, and rules, see 3 AAC 31, art. 2.